Hawaii, session 2026, SB975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $38,700,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fifteenth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Moanalua High School A.   Plans, design, and construction for new weight room; equipment and appurtenances. Plans and design             $3,000,000 Construction                $16,000,000 Equipment                    $1,000,000 Total funding                              $20,000,000 2.   Radford High School A.   Design and construction for electrical upgrades. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,500,000 Total funding                               $3,000,000 B.   Design and construction to replace five portable buildings. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,500,000 Total funding                               $3,000,000 C.   Plans, design, and construction for an artificial turf practice field and baseball field; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $300,000 Design                         $400,000 Construction                 $9,000,000 Equipment                      $400,000 Total funding                              $10,100,000 3.   Salt Lake Elementary School A.   Plans, design, and construction for installation of air conditioning in classrooms F-4 through F-7; equipment and appurtenances. Plans                          $200,000 Design                         $300,000 Construction                   $600,000 Equipment                    $1,500,000 Total funding                               $2,600,000 SECTION 2. The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended for the purposes of this Act by the department of education. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________